Hawaii statutes.
[§205-44.5] Important agricultural lands;
public lands. (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, before
December 31, 2009, the department of agriculture and the department of land and
natural resources shall collaborate to identify public lands as defined under
section 171-2 that should be designated important agricultural lands as defined
in section 205-42 and shall cause to be prepared maps delineating those lands.
In making the designations, the departments shall use the standards and
criteria of section 205-44.

(b) The designation of important agricultural
lands pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the district boundary
amendment procedures of section 205-3.1 or 205-4 or declaratory order
procedures of section 205-45.

(c) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
beginning January 1, 2010, after receipt of the maps of public lands identified
as important agricultural lands pursuant to subsection (a), the commission
shall designate the public lands as important agricultural lands and adopt the
maps of those public lands. Upon designation, the public lands shall be
subject to this chapter. [L 2008, c 233, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next